Illinois, session 104th, HB4711.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Provenance Data Requirements Act. 6    Section 5. Definitions. As used in this Act: 7    "Artificial intelligence" means a machine-based system 8that, for explicit or implicit objectives, infers, from the 9input it receives, how to generate outputs, such as 10predictions, content, recommendations, or decisions that can 11influence physical or virtual environments. For the purposes 12of this definition a system that uses "artificial 13intelligence" may vary in its level of autonomy and 14adaptations after deployment. 15    "Capture device" means a device that can record 16photographs, audio, or video content, including, but not 17limited to, video and still photography cameras, mobile phones 18with built-in cameras or microphones, and voice recorders. 19    "Content" means any visual or audio digital content. 20    "Generative artificial intelligence model" means an 21artificial intelligence model designed to generate new data or 22content based on the patterns or structures from its training 23data.   HB4711- 2 -LRB104 18623 SPS 32066 b1    "Generative artificial intelligence model" does not 2include nongenerative capabilities like classification, 3predictions, or labeling. 4    "Generative artificial intelligence tool provider" means 5an entity that develops a generative artificial intelligence 6tool that is made publicly available for use by people in this 7State. 8    "Generative artificial intelligence tool" means a product 9or feature that provides the outputs from a generative 10artificial intelligence model to end users. 11    "Large online platform" means a public-facing social media 12platform, content-sharing platform, messaging platform, 13advertising network, or standalone search engine that 14distributes content to users who did not create or collaborate 15in creating the content. For the purposes of this definition, 16a "large online platform" shall have 1,000,000 or more unique 17monthly users during the preceding 12-month period. 18    "Provenance application tool" means a tool or online 19service that makes provenance data difficult to remove and 20allows users to easily apply provenance data. 21    "Provenance data" means information, such as the origin of 22a piece of content and the history of modifications to the 23content, that is in a format that is compliant with 24widely-adopted guidelines or specifications promulgated by an 25established standards-setting body, and includes, but is not 26limited to:   HB4711- 3 -LRB104 18623 SPS 32066 b1        (1) whether some or all of the content is synthetic 2    content; and 3        (2) when there is synthetic content, the name of the 4    generative artificial provider whose generative artificial 5    tool generated the synthetic content. 6    "Provenance reader" means a tool or service that allows 7users to view provenance data and its integrity. 8    "Synthetic content" means visual or audio content that has 9been produced or modified by a generative artificial tool. 10    Section 10. Operative provisions for generative artificial 11intelligence tools. 12    (a) A generative artificial intelligence tool provider 13shall apply provenance data, either directly or through the 14use of third-party technology, to wholly-generated synthetic 15content generated by the provider's generative artificial 16intelligence tool. 17    (b) A generative artificial intelligence tool provider 18shall make available a provenance application tool that 19enables the user to apply provenance data, either directly or 20through the use of third-party technology, to content that has 21been significantly modified to include synthetic content. 22    (c) A generative artificial intelligence tool provider 23shall make a provenance reader available to the public. 24    Section 15. Operative provisions for large online   HB4711- 4 -LRB104 18623 SPS 32066 b1platforms. A large online platform shall: 2        (1) retain any available provenance data in content 3    provided to or posted on the large online platform; and 4        (2) make available to a consumer of content in this 5    State either (i) the provenance data or a conspicuous 6    indicator that provenance data is available. 7    Section 20. Operative provisions for capture devices. A 8manufacturer of a capture device shall include the ability for 9a user to enable the inclusion of provenance data in the user's 10captured content.